Nebraska, session 109, LB405.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB405 LB405
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 53-123.17, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
53-123.17 (1) A local governing body may designate an entertainment
district in which a commons area may be used by retail, craft brewery,
and microdistillery licensees and holders of a manufacturer's license
which obtain an entertainment district license. The local governing body
may , at any time, revoke such designation if it finds that the commons
area threatens the health, safety, or welfare of the public or has become
a common nuisance. The local governing body shall file the designation or
the revocation of the designation with the commission.
(2) An entertainment district license allows the sale of alcoholic
liquor for consumption on the premises within the confines of a commons
area. The consumption of alcoholic liquor in the commons area shall only
occur during the hours authorized for sale of alcoholic liquor for
consumption on the premises under section 53-179 and while food service
is available in the commons area. Only the holder of an entertainment
district license or employees of such licensee may sell or dispense
alcoholic liquor in the commons area.
(3) An entertainment district licensee shall serve alcoholic liquor
to be consumed in the commons area in containers that prominently
displays the licensee's trade name or logo or some other mark that is
unique to the licensee under the licensee's retail license, craft brewery
license, microdistillery license, or manufacturer's license. An
entertainment district licensee may allow alcohol sold by another
entertainment district licensee to enter the licensed premises of either
licensee. No entertainment district licensee shall allow alcoholic liquor
to leave the commons area or the premises licensed under its retail
license, craft brewery license, microdistillery license, or
manufacturer's license.
(4) If the licensed premises of the holder of a license to sell
alcoholic liquor at retail issued under subsection (6) of section 53-124,
-2-

LB405 LB405
2025 2025
a craft brewery license, a microdistillery license, or a manufacturer's
license is adjacent to a commons area in an entertainment district
designated by a local governing body pursuant to this section, the holder
of the license may obtain an annual entertainment district license as
prescribed in this section. The entertainment district license shall be
issued for the same period and may be renewed in the same manner as the
retail license, craft brewery license, microdistillery license, or
manufacturer's license.
(5) In order to obtain an entertainment district license, a person
eligible under subsection (4) of this section shall:
(a) File an application with the commission upon such forms as the
commission prescribes; and
(b) Pay an additional license fee of three hundred dollars for the
privilege of serving alcohol in the entertainment district payable to the
clerk of the local governing body in the same manner as license fees
under subdivision (4) of section 53-134.
(6) When an application for an entertainment district license is
filed, the commission shall notify the clerk of the local governing body.
The commission shall include with such notice one copy of the application
by mail or electronic delivery. The local governing body and the
commission shall process the application in the same manner as provided
in section 53-132.
(7) The local governing body may impose an occupation tax on the
business of an entertainment district licensee doing business within the
liquor license jurisdiction of the local governing body as provided in
subdivision (11)(b) of this section in accordance with section 53-132.
(8) The local governing body with respect to entertainment district
licensees within its liquor license jurisdiction as provided in
subdivision (11)(b) of this section may cancel an entertainment district
license for cause for the remainder of the period for which such
entertainment district license is issued. Any person whose entertainment
-3-

LB405 LB405
2025 2025
district license is canceled may appeal to the commission in accordance
with section 53-134.
(9) A local governing body may regulate by ordinance, not
inconsistent with the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, any area it designates
as an entertainment district.
(10) Violation of any provision of this section or any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this section by an
entertainment district licensee may be cause to revoke, cancel, or
suspend the retail license issued under subsection (6) of section 53-124,
craft brewery license, microdistillery license, or manufacturer's license
held by such licensee.
(11) For purposes of this section:
(a) Commons area means an area:
(i) Within an entertainment district designated by a local governing
body;
(ii) Shared by authorized licensees with entertainment district
licenses;
(iii) Abutting the licensed premises of such licensees;
(iv) Having limited pedestrian accessibility by use of a physical
barrier, either on a permanent or temporary basis; and
(v) Closed to vehicular traffic when used as a commons area.
Commons area may include any area of a public or private right-of-
way if the area otherwise meets the requirements of this section; and
(b) Local governing body means the governing body of the city or
village in which the entertainment district licensee is located.
Sec. 2. Original section 53-123.17, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-